Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,198
Accident; report; suspend permit; inspection.

The owner of an amusement ride shall send a copy of any accident report required by his or her insurer to the State Fire Marshal. The State Fire Marshal may provide for the suspension of the permit of operation for any amusement ride the breakdown or malfunction of which directly caused serious injury or death of any person. The State Fire Marshal may also require an inspection of any amusement ride, whose operation has resulted in any serious injury or death, before operation of such amusement ride may be resumed.

Laws 1987, LB 226, § 8;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-1808;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 34.